Alaska statutes. Title 46. Water, Air, Energy, and Environmental Conservation.
Article 4. Local Programs.

Sec. 46.14.400.
Local air quality control programs.

With the approval of the department, a municipality may establish and administer within its jurisdiction a local air quality control program that operates in lieu of and is consistent with all or part of the department’s air quality program as established under this chapter. A first or second class borough may administer an air quality control program approved by the department under this subsection on an areawide basis and is not subject to the restrictions for acquiring additional areawide powers specified in AS

29.35.300

—

29.35.350

. A third class borough may administer a local air quality control program approved by the department under this subsection only in a service area formed under AS

29.35.490(b)

or (c).

With the approval of the department, two or more municipalities or other entities may create a local air quality district for the purpose of jointly administering a local air quality control program within the boundaries of the air quality district.

If the department finds that the location, character, or extent of particular concentrations of population, air pollutant emissions units, the geographic, topographic, or meteorological considerations, or a combination of these factors make impracticable the maintenance of appropriate levels of air quality without an areawide air pollution control program, the department may determine the boundaries within which a local air quality control program is necessary and direct that a local air quality control program spanning those boundaries is the only acceptable alternative to direct state administration.

A municipality or a local air quality district seeking department approval for a local air quality control program shall enter into a cooperative agreement with the department that is designed to avoid unnecessary duplication of responsibilities. The cooperative agreement must include provisions specifying

the respective duties and authority of the department and the municipality or local air quality district in the administration of the local air quality control program;

the authority of the municipality or the local air quality district to employ staff to administer the local air quality control program;

duties of staff employed under (2) of this subsection;

the procedures that must be followed by the municipality or local air quality district when requesting money from the clean air protection fund to cover the costs of implementing the municipality’s or district’s air quality program;

the procedures that will be used by the department in approving a request under (4) of this subsection and submitting it to the legislature for funding;

respective enforcement responsibilities of the department and the municipality or the local air quality district;

that if the municipality or local air quality control district seeks authority to take action under (f) of this section, the municipality or local air quality control district will use procedures that are substantially equivalent to those required under AS

46.14.010

and

46.14.015

.

A local air quality control program shall provide for the exemption of a locally registered motor vehicle from motor vehicle emission requirements adopted under AS

46.14.510

if the motor vehicle is not used within the program’s jurisdiction.

A municipality or a local air quality district administering a program under this section shall administer its local air quality control program according to this chapter, regulations adopted under those sections, and its cooperative agreement under (d) of this section. A municipality or local air quality district’s program may, upon a finding by the local agency and an affirmative agreement by the department, establish a more stringent requirement than the stationary emissions unit permit program authorized under this chapter if public health or air quality effects provide a reasonable basis to regulate the emissions unit with the additional or more stringent requirement and the municipality or district has used procedures substantially equivalent to those required under AS

46.14.010

and

46.14.015

before establishing the more stringent requirement. This subsection does not prohibit a municipality or local air quality control district from establishing a mobile source emissions program more stringent than the state program without making findings of public health or air quality effects or using procedures substantially equivalent to those required under AS

46.14.010

and

46.14.015

. In this subsection, “mobile source” does not include tank vessels or other watercraft.

A determination, order, permit, or permit action issued under a local air quality control program is considered to be a determination, order, permit, or permit action of the department.

Notwithstanding any other law or rule of law, the department may not delegate or enable another department or government entity to establish fee rates or collect fees under AS

46.14.240

or

46.14.250

.

If a municipality or a local air quality district administering a program under this section requires emissions inspection for a motor vehicle, emission inspection may not be required more than once every two years.

A person who operates a motor vehicle in violation of emissions requirements imposed under this section is guilty of a violation and, upon conviction, shall be fined an amount not to exceed $500. It is the intent of the legislature that money collected under this subsection be appropriated to promote air quality control programs in municipalities.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1993; am § 4 ch 56 SLA 1995; am §§ 39, 40 ch 46 SLA 2003; am § 5 ch 97 SLA 2003; am §§ 75, 76 ch 56 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For emissions inspection and maintenance requirements, see 18 AAC 52, art. 1.

Sec. 46.14.410.
Inadequacy of local program.

If a municipality or a local air quality district has an approved local air quality control program and the department determines that the program is being implemented in a manner that fails to meet the terms of the cooperative agreement or is otherwise being inappropriately administered, the department shall give written notice setting out its determination to the municipality or local air quality district. Within 45 days after giving written notice, the department shall conduct a public hearing on the matter. The hearing shall be recorded by any means that ensures an accurate record.

If, after the hearing, the department upholds the determination made in the written notice, the department shall provide the municipality or local air quality district with a written finding setting out the nature of the deficiencies and a description of the necessary action to be taken to ensure that the local air quality control program prevents or controls air pollution. The department shall provide its finding to the municipality or district within 45 days after closure of the public hearing record. The department shall set a reasonable period of time for the municipality or local air quality district to take corrective action in response to the department’s finding.

If the municipality or local air quality district fails to take corrective action within the time period set by the department under (b) of this section, the department shall terminate the cooperative agreement and resume management of air quality control in the affected jurisdiction. If the municipality or the local air quality district partially remedies, to the department’s satisfaction, the deficiencies found in the determination, the department shall amend the cooperative agreement to reflect a modified allocation of responsibilities between the department and municipality or the local air quality district.

A municipality or local air quality district that has had its cooperative agreement terminated may, with the department’s approval, resume a local air quality control program if the municipality or district agrees to comply with AS

46.14.400

and with any corrective action plan required by the department.

If the department finds that control of a particular class of stationary source or emissions unit, because of its complexity or magnitude, is beyond the reasonable capability of the municipality or the local air quality district or may be more efficiently and economically controlled at the state level, the department may assume and retain jurisdiction over the class of stationary source or emissions unit. Classifications under this subsection may be based on the nature of stationary sources or emissions units involved, their size relative to the size of the communities in which they are located, or another basis established by the department.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1993; am § 41 ch 46 SLA 2003; am § 77 ch 56 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For emissions inspection and maintenance requirements, see 18 AAC 52, art. 1.